Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-225
County fair board; officers; employees.

The county fair board shall select a president, vice president, and treasurer from its own number. The county fair board shall select a county fair secretary who may be a member of the county fair board or may be selected from among other persons. The county fair board may employ such persons as it deems necessary for the proper management of the fair and shall have complete charge and supervision of the real estate and other property. All actions of an elected county fair board shall be taken in the name of the (name of county) County Fair. Actions by an appointed county fair board shall be taken in the name of the county.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 6, p. 378;

C.S.1922, § 62;

C.S.1929, § 2-215;

R.S.1943, § 2-225;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 6.